Georgia statutes. 
When the record shows that the contract was entered upon the minutes of the board of commissioners, but that certain specifications were omitted, it was legal for the judge to order the entry of the contract on the minutes. King v. Casey, 164 Ga. 117, 137 S.E. 776 (1927).

Specific contract must be entered. - Although the superintendent of public works had general written authority, duly entered upon the minutes, of the board of commissioners of roads and revenues to employ men, if the specific contract with the plaintiff was not in writing and had never been entered upon the minutes of the board, the plaintiff cannot recover. Garner v. Floyd County, 24 Ga. App. 693, 101 S.E. 918 (1920).

Simple memorandum on minutes of county commissioners that designated person was elected county physician will not authorize suit against county. Laurens County v. Thomas, 6 Ga. App. 568, 65 S.E. 302 (1909).

Signature of the chair of the board of commissioners is sufficient if authorized. Pilcher v. English, 133 Ga. 496, 66 S.E. 163 (1909).

Types of Contracts

When fiscal affairs governed by commissioners. - When a board of commissioners, or a board consisting of a single commissioner, has been created to take the place of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) in the management of certain county affairs, this section applies. Wood v. Puritan Chem. Co., 178 Ga. 229, 172 S.E. 557 (1934).

When the fiscal affairs of a county have been placed in the hands of commissioners, this section is applicable to contracts made in behalf of the county by the commissioners. Graham v. Beacham, 189 Ga. 304, 5 S.E.2d 775 (1939).

Statute is applicable to contracts made in behalf of the county by commissioners. Malcom v. Webb, 211 Ga. 449, 86 S.E.2d 489 (1955).

When the fiscal affairs of a county have been placed in the hands of commissioners, this law is applicable to contracts made in behalf of the county by the commissioners. Commercial Credit Corp. v. Mason, 151 Ga. App. 443, 260 S.E.2d 352 (1979).

Assignment not within section. - Assignment by a county of claims to a certain bonus was held not to be such a contract as is contemplated by this section. Brown v. Rutledge & Summerour, 20 Ga. App. 118, 92 S.E. 774 (1917).

Creation of relation of principal and agent between a city and a county by which the former authorizes the latter to contract in behalf of the city for the paving of the city's streets, which are to constitute links in an interconnecting county seat highway which the State Highway Department (now Department of Transportation) and the county propose to construct, is not such a contract as is required to be in writing and spread upon the minutes of the board of county commissioners of such county. Faver v. Mayor of Washington, 159 Ga. 568, 126 S.E. 464 (1925).

Effect on tax levy. - It is not essential to the validity of a tax levy for specified purposes that contracts for effectuating such purposes should have been previously made and entered on the minutes. Blalock v. Adams, 154 Ga. 326, 114 S.E. 345 (1922).

Applicability to board of education. - This section does not apply to a county board of education. Wilson v. Strange, 235 Ga. 156, 219 S.E.2d 88 (1975).

Contract by county board of education with a person for the transportation of pupils to and from a public school is not one which is required by this section to be in writing and spread upon its minutes. Board of Educ. v. Hunt, 159 Ga. 749, 126 S.E. 789 (1925).

Applicability to salaries of county officials. - This section refers only to contracts, and the payment of salaries of county officials and employees is not contractual within the statute's provisions. First Nat'l Bank v. Mann, 211 Ga. 706, 88 S.E.2d 361 (1955).

While this section provides that all contracts entered into by the governing authority with other persons in behalf of the county shall be in writing and entered on the minutes, the payment of salaries of county officials and employees is not contractual within the statute's provisions. Deason v. DeKalb County, 222 Ga. 63, 148 S.E.2d 414 (1966).

In a dispute between a county and a county state court judge over a supplement to the judge's salary, summary judgment for the judge was proper on the county's claim for reimbursement of the judge's salary supplement because the county failed to show that the supplement was paid with the total absence or want of power. Even if the supplement was paid in violation of the Open Meetings Act, O.C.G.A. § 50-14-1 et seq., the county's counterclaim was filed well outside the 90-day limitation period in O.C.G.A. § 50-14-1(b)(2). Heiskell v. Roberts, 342 Ga. App. 109, 802 S.E.2d 385 (2017).

No waiver of sovereign immunity without written contract. - Developer failed to meet the developer's burden of showing waiver of sovereign immunity because even if the parties' conduct after the expiration of the contract could be found to demonstrate that the developer was to continue to perform under the original contract, as a matter of law, neither that conduct nor the internal documents created by state agency after the contract expired established a written contract to do so and without a written contract, the state's sovereign immunity was not waived. Georgia Department of Labor v. RTT Associates, Inc., 299 Ga. 78, 786 S.E.2d 840 (2016).

County attorney. - The exercise of the implied power conferred upon the county commissioners to designate a county attorney and to fix the attorney's term and salary may be effectually executed by a resolution of the county commissioners, duly passed and spread upon their minutes. Such transaction does not fall within the purview of this section, which requires all contracts entered into with other persons on behalf of the county to be in writing and entered on their minutes. The relation between the county and the county attorney does not rest upon contract, but arises from appointment impliedly authorized by legislative enactment. Templeman v. Jeffries, 172 Ga. 895, 159 S.E. 248 (1931).

When the relation between a county and an attorney does not rest upon contract, but arises from the appointment of the attorney as a public officer, the transaction does not fall under this section. Walker v. Stephens, 175 Ga. 405, 165 S.E. 99 (1932).

Procedure

Compliance must be alleged in plaintiff's petition. Milburn v. Glynn County, 109 Ga. 473, 34 S.E. 848 (1899); Carolina Metal Prods. Co. v. Taliaferro County, 28 Ga. App. 57, 110 S.E. 331 (1922).

In an action against a county for the breach of an alleged contract with the county authorities in charge of the county's fiscal affairs, it is necessary to allege that the contract was in writing and was entered upon the minutes of such authorities in order to make the contract a valid and enforceable contract against the county. A failure to so allege makes the petition subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Sosebee v. Hall County, 50 Ga. App. 21, 177 S.E. 71 (1934).

Suit against a county, based upon an alleged contract with the county, is defective unless it is alleged that such contract is in writing and has been entered on the minutes as required by the statute. When the petition fails to make such essential allegations, it is subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Graham v. Beacham, 189 Ga. 304, 5 S.E.2d 775 (1939).

Petition is subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) which alleges that contracts have been entered into with a county but which fails to allege that the contracts were in writing and entered on the minutes of the proper county authority. Hobbs v. Howell, 204 Ga. 370, 49 S.E.2d 827 (1948).

All contracts entered into with other persons on behalf of the county shall be in writing and entered upon its minutes. If the fiscal affairs of the county are in charge of a board of commissioners, the law applicable to judges of the probate court with respect to the management of county affairs governs. Unless there has been a full compliance with the statutory provisions relative to contracts with a county, which fact must appear from the plaintiffs' petition, the petition is subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Moore v. Baker, 85 Ga. App. 234, 68 S.E.2d 911 (1952).

Petition sufficient. - Petition alleging that county commissioners had entered into contracts with one of the commissioner's members for the construction of roads in the county without the contracts being in writing and being entered on the minutes of the board, and in violation of the contracts between the State Highway Department (now Department of Transportation) and the county was sufficient as against a general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) to show that the plaintiffs were entitled to some of the substantial relief prayed for. Ferguson v. Randolph County, 211 Ga. 103, 84 S.E.2d 70 (1954).

Failure to record is a matter of defense against payment, when suit is brought on county warrants, and not upon the contract itself. Americus Grocery Co. v. Pitts Banking Co., 169 Ga. 70, 149 S.E. 776 (1929).

Waiver of noncompliance. - Failure to comply with this section is waived when no objection is made until after the verdict. Early County v. Fielder & Allen Co., 4 Ga. App. 268, 63 S.E. 353 (1908).

Objection must be timely. - Whether or not the provisions of former Code 1933, § 23-1701 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-10-1), would in any event apply to a written agreement to submit a matter in suit to arbitration under former Code 1933, § 7-411 (see now O.C.G.A. § 9-9-70), the fact that the agreement was never so entered was not available as a defense in the instant suit for mandamus, since an objection based upon this ground, if valid, should have been made before the entry of the judgment on the award. Hall County v. Smith, 178 Ga. 212, 172 S.E. 645 (1934).

Conformity a matter of proof at trial. - Under this section, and in view of the construction placed upon the statute by the Supreme Court, a suit based upon an alleged contract with the county cannot prevail when it is not shown that there has been compliance with this section. Spears v. Robertson, 170 Ga. 368, 152 S.E. 903 (1930).

Plaintiff may not recover from a county on a contract unless the contract is on the minutes; this is a matter of proof at trial and not a matter of pleading. PMS Constr. Co. v. DeKalb County, 243 Ga. 870, 257 S.E.2d 285 (1979).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Statute applies to implied and written county contracts without distinction. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 80-128.

County may enforce implied contract but implied contract cannot be enforced against a county. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 80-128.

Not entered upon minutes. - Although county contracts which are written but not entered in the minutes are unenforceable, such failure is a curable defect. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 80-128.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 231.

ALR. - Elements bearing directly upon the quality of a contract as affecting the character of one as independent contractor, 20 A.L.R. 684.

Construction of paving contract or contractor's bond in respect of the contractor's obligation as to repairs, 72 A.L.R. 644.

Power of municipality to fix specific scale of wages or hours for employees of contractors or subcontractors for municipal contracts, 81 A.L.R. 349; 129 A.L.R. 763.

Inclusion in contract for public work of provision regarding extension of time for performance not specifically set out in the call for bids, 114 A.L.R. 1437.

36-10-2. Letting of contracts for public works.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 2, effective April 20, 2000.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 159, § 1; Ga. L. 1880-81, p. 183, § 1; Code 1882, § 493a; Civil Code 1895, § 344; Civil Code 1910, § 387; Code 1933, § 23-1702; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1989, p. 356, § 4.

36-10-2.1. Letting by counties with population of 800,000 or more.

Statute text

In any county of this state having a population of 800,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 2000 or any future such census, contracts for building or repairing any courthouse or other public building, jail, bridge, causeway, or other public works or public property shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, but the governing authority of any such county shall have the right to reject any or all bids for any such contract. The governing authority of any such county, in considering whether a bidder is responsible, may consider the bidder's quality of work, general reputation in the community, financial responsibility, previous employment on public works, and compliance with a minority business enterprise participation plan or making a good faith effort to comply with the goals of such a plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-10-2.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 309, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 166, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1473, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Minority business enterprise. - Enactment of O.C.G.A. § 36-10-2.1 did not affirm a county's authority to take minority business enterprise compliance into account in letting contracts prior to 1986. S.J. Groves & Sons Co. v. Fulton County, 920 F.2d 752 (11th Cir.), cert. denied, 500 U.S. 959, 111 S. Ct. 2274, 114 L. Ed. 2d 725, cert. denied, 501 U.S. 1252, 111 S. Ct. 2893, 115 L. Ed. 2d 1057 (1991).

36-10-2.2. Letting by certain counties with population of more than 150,000.

Statute text

In any county having a population of more than 150,000 in any metropolitan statistical area having a population of not less than 260,000 nor more than 360,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, contracts for building or repairing any courthouse or other public building, jail, bridge, causeway, or other public works or public property shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder, but the governing authority of any such county shall have the right to reject any or all bids for any such contract. The governing authority of any such county, in considering whether a bidder is responsible, may consider the bidder's quality of work, general reputation in the community, financial responsibility, previous employment on public works, and compliance with a minority business enterprise participation plan or making a good faith effort to comply with the goals of such a plan.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-10-2.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 989, § 1.)

36-10-3 through 36-10-5.

Statute text

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 498, § 2, effective April 20, 2000.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Former Code Sections 36-10-3 through 36-10-5, relating to contracts for public works, were based on Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 159, § 3, p. 160, §§ 2, 4; Code 1882, §§ 493b-493d; Ga. L. 1889, p. 49, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 345, 346; Penal Code 1895, § 279; Civil Code 1910, §§ 388, 389; Penal Code 1910, § 283; Ga. L. 1920, p. 58, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 23-1703, 23-1704, 23-9904; Ga. L. 1939, p. 193, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 547, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 954, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2029, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 534, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 641, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 278, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 356, § 5.

——————————

CHAPTER 11

CLAIMS AGAINST COUNTIES

Sec.

36-11-1. Time for presentation of claims.

36-11-2. Audit and registration of claims against county; issuance of order on treasurer for claim; specification of fund on which order drawn.

36-11-3. When orders to be paid; registration of orders issued.

36-11-4. Order in which county debts paid.

36-11-5. Interest on orders presented and not paid.

36-11-6. Negotiability of county orders.

36-11-7. Satisfaction of judgment against county.

Annotations

Cross references. - Liability of Department of Transportation for actions against counties relating to public roads forming part of state highway system, § 32-2-6.

36-11-1. Time for presentation of claims.

Statute text

All claims against counties must be presented within 12 months after they accrue or become payable or the same are barred, provided that minors or other persons laboring under disabilities shall be allowed 12 months after the removal of the disability to present their claims.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 479; Code 1868, § 541; Code 1873, § 507; Code 1882, § 507; Civil Code 1895, § 362; Civil Code 1910, § 411; Code 1933, § 23-1602.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981). For article surveying developments in Georgia torts law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 247 (1981). For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982). For article, "Claims Against Counties: The Difference a Year Makes," see 36 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (1984). For article, "Defending the Lawsuit: A First-Round Checklist," see 22 Ga. St. B. J. 24 (1985). For annual survey on local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990). For annual survey on law of torts, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 431 (1990). For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015). For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 257 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Specific Claims

Presentation of Claims

Procedure

General Consideration

Constitutionality. - This section, providing that "all claims against counties must be presented within 12 months after they accrue or become payable, or the same are barred," is not inconsistent with Ga. Const. 1976, Art. IX, Sec. VI, Para. II (see, now, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. IX). Cobb v. Board of Comm'rs of Rds. & Revenue, 151 Ga. App. 472, 260 S.E.2d 496 (1979).

Purpose of this section is to afford the county an opportunity to investigate the claim and ascertain the evidence, and to avoid the incurrence of unnecessary litigation. Stelling v. Richmond County, 81 Ga. App. 571, 59 S.E.2d 414 (1950).

Rationale behind presentment of claim. - Object of presenting a claim to a county before the institution of suit is to afford the county an opportunity to investigate the claim and ascertain the evidence, and to avoid the incurrence of unnecessary litigation. Davis v. Cobb County, 65 Ga. App. 533, 15 S.E.2d 814 (1941); Sikes v. Candler County, 247 Ga. 115, 274 S.E.2d 464 (1981).

Comparison with § 36-33-5. - While former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5), providing for the filing of a claim against a municipality before suit against such municipality, is unlike the provisions of former Code 1933, § 23-1602 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1) relative to the presentment of claims against a county, the objects and purposes of these two statutes are similar. Davis v. Cobb County, 65 Ga. App. 533, 15 S.E.2d 814 (1941).

Construction with O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b). - Limited waiver of sovereign immunity set forth in O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b) does not implicate the 12-month presentation requirement under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Warnell v. Unified Gov't of Athens-Clarke County, 328 Ga. App. 903, 763 S.E.2d 284 (2014).

Substantial compliance with statutory requirements of ante litem notice is sufficient to give notice of a claim to a county. Burton v. DeKalb County, 202 Ga. App. 676, 415 S.E.2d 647, cert. denied, 202 Ga. App. 905, 415 S.E.2d 647 (1992).

Existence of cause of action. - Under this section, a cause of action against a county such as can be recovered upon does not exist unless the claim has been presented within 12 months after the claim's accrual. Atlantic Coast Line R.R. v. Mitchell County, 36 Ga. App. 47, 135 S.E. 223 (1926).

Principle of common honesty is beside the mark in determining whether the action, whatever be its nature, is subject to the bar of the statute of limitations. Mobley v. Murray County, 178 Ga. 388, 173 S.E. 680 (1934).

Availability of injunction. - When a nuisance is continuing, the property owner is entitled to seek an injunction, as well as damages for the 12 months preceding, upon giving notice to the county. Duffield v. DeKalb County, 242 Ga. 432, 249 S.E.2d 235 (1978).

Trial court erred in denying the city's motion for judgment on the pleadings because it was undisputed that the property owner failed to serve either the mayor, or chair of the city council or city commission; thus, the property owner did not comply with the ante litem notice statute, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(f), which was fatal to the property's owner claim. City of Albany v. GA HY Imports, LLC, 348 Ga. App. 885, 825 S.E.2d 385 (2019).

Cited in Baggett v. Barrow, 166 Ga. 700, 144 S.E. 251 (1928); Habersham County v. Cornwall, 38 Ga. App. 419, 144 S.E. 55 (1928); Newsome v. Treutlen County, 168 Ga. 764, 149 S.E. 44 (1929); Effingham County v. Zittrouer, 39 Ga. App. 115, 146 S.E. 351 (1929); Felton v. Macon County, 43 Ga. App. 651, 159 S.E. 730 (1931); Morris v. Floyd County, 46 Ga. App. 150, 167 S.E. 127 (1932); MacNeill v. Steele, 186 Ga. 792, 199 S.E. 99 (1938); Habersham County v. Knight, 63 Ga. App. 720, 12 S.E.2d 129 (1940); State Hwy. Dep't v. McClain, 216 Ga. 1, 114 S.E.2d 125 (1960); Lorenz v. DeKalb County, 102 Ga. App. 9, 115 S.E.2d 487 (1960); Richmond County v. Sibert, 218 Ga. 209, 126 S.E.2d 761 (1962); Clayton County v. Sarno, 112 Ga. App. 379, 145 S.E.2d 283 (1965); DeKalb County v. McFarland, 223 Ga. 196, 154 S.E.2d 203 (1967); Fulton County v. Woodside, 223 Ga. 316, 155 S.E.2d 404 (1967); Polk County v. Anderson, 116 Ga. App. 546, 158 S.E.2d 315 (1967); Evans County v. McDonald, 133 Ga. App. 955, 213 S.E.2d 82 (1975); Christensen v. Floyd County, 158 Ga. App. 274, 279 S.E.2d 723 (1981); Neely v. Richmond County, 161 Ga. App. 71, 289 S.E.2d 258 (1982); Mullins v. Columbia County, 202 Ga. App. 148, 413 S.E.2d 489 (1991); Clayton County v. City of College Park, 301 Ga. 653, 803 S.E.2d 63 (2017); Department of Public Safety v. Ragsdale, Ga. , 839 S.E.2d 541 (2020).

Specific Claims

When the right to and amount of a claim is fixed by law, such claim does not come within the purview of those claims barred by this section. The claims intended to be barred by this section have reference to claims growing out of contract or breach of duty. Norris v. Nixon, 78 Ga. App. 769, 52 S.E.2d 529 (1949); Owens v. Floyd County, 94 Ga. App. 532, 95 S.E.2d 389 (1956) (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1).

Applicable only to claims arising from contract. - Requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 on presenting claims apply to claims arising from contract and do not apply to a claim when the right to and amount of the claim is fixed by law as when a hospital furnishes emergency services to pregnant indigent residents of the county under O.C.G.A. § 31-8-40 et seq. Terrell County v. Albany/Dougherty Hosp. Auth., 256 Ga. 627, 352 S.E.2d 378 (1987).

Mandamus claim. - After federal claims were dismissed in a former employee's action against a county employer, the employee's mandamus claims against a county official for reinstatement were not straightforward so as to allow the court to accept jurisdiction of state claims under 28 U.S.C. § 1367 because it was unclear whether ante litem notice was required under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 and whether a one-year limitation of O.C.G.A. § 9-3-33 applied to the mandamus claim. Toma v. Columbia County, F. Supp. 2d (S.D. Ga. Apr. 20, 2007).

Affirmative action programs. - O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 did not apply to bar plaintiffs' federal and state constitutional claims arising from defendants' operation of a county's minority and female business enterprise program. Webster v. Fulton County, 44 F. Supp. 2d 1359 (N.D. Ga. 1999).

Landowners' claims for nuisance, trespass, negligence, and violation of riparian rights. - County was entitled to summary judgment on a landowner's claims for nuisance, trespass, negligence, and violation of riparian rights because the county had sovereign immunity as to all claims which did not amount to an inverse condemnation of the land, and the condemnation claim was barred by the landowner's failure to provide proper ante-litem notice pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 within 12 months of when the landowner's claim accrued. Jones v. E.R. Snell Contr., Inc., 333 F. Supp. 2d 1344 (N.D. Ga. 2004).

Applicability of sovereign immunity to action between city and county. - In a case involving taxation of alcoholic beverages, the city's claims against the county were not barred by sovereign immunity since the city and county were merely exercising their own respective home rule powers by collecting tax revenues for their own purposes, and neither was acting on behalf of the State of Georgia; thus, there was no sovereignty to be maintained. City of College Park v. Clayton County, 306 Ga. 301, 830 S.E.2d 179 (2019).

Suit to hold governmental officer personally liable. - Plaintiffs were not compelled to notify sheriff of the suit in advance of filing suit against the sheriff because a party seeking a money judgment holding a governmental officer or agent personally liable, albeit for actions in the officer's or agent's official capacity, is a suit against the individual and not the government. Strickland v. Wilson, 205 Ga. App. 91, 421 S.E.2d 94 (1992), cert. denied, 205 Ga. App. 901, 421 S.E.2d 94 (1992).

Actions against school districts. - In the absence of an expression of legislative intent to apply the statute of limitations to actions against school districts, and in the absence of any specific bar to limit actions against school districts, O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 does not apply to school districts. Payne v. Blackwell, 259 Ga. 483, 384 S.E.2d 393 (1989).

Salaries of public officers which have been fixed by law do not come within the bar of this statute. Stelling v. Richmond County, 81 Ga. App. 571, 59 S.E.2d 414 (1950).

Salary of commissioner. - This section is not applicable to allowances for salary of the road commissioner under a local law as the commissioner's salary is an allowance provided by law for the benefit of the commissioner as a public officer, and has no reference to contract or breach of duty. Sammons v. Glascock County, 161 Ga. 893, 131 S.E. 881 (1926).

Tax collector commissions. - Since the duty of the county authorities to pay the tax collector commissions and the amount of commissions thus payable to the tax collector, as compensation to a public officer, are both fixed and determined by law, it is not incumbent upon the tax collector to present the collector's claim within 12 months in order to prevent it from becoming barred under this section. Bibb County v. Winslett, 191 Ga. 860, 14 S.E.2d 108 (1941).

When bond is given, any action thereon is limited to one year from the completion of the contract and acceptance of the work by proper public authorities. Standard Oil Co. v. Jasper County, 53 Ga. App. 804, 187 S.E. 307 (1936).

Claim of payee of void note. - Claim against a county by a payee of a void note for money used by the county and paid out on outstanding valid warrants, even if enforceable against the county, was barred since it was not presented within 12 months after accrual. Farmers' Loan & Trust Co. v. Wilcox County, 2 F.2d 465 (5th Cir. 1924).

County warrants. - County warrants are not such "claims" as are required to be presented within 12 months after the claims accrue or become payable. Jackson Banking Co. v. Gaston, 149 Ga. 31, 99 S.E. 30 (1919); Commercial Trust Co. v. Laurens County, 267 F. 897 (S.D. Ga. 1920); Central of Ga. Ry. v. Wright, 35 Ga. App. 144, 132 S.E. 449 (1926).

Claim to be subrogated to rights of former holders of county warrants paid with money of claimant is one which must be presented within 12 months after accrual. Farmers' Loan & Trust Co. v. Wilcox County, 298 F. 772 (S.D. Ga.), aff'd, 2 F.2d 465 (5th Cir. 1924).

Assertion of ownership of land in possession of county is not such claim as must be presented within 12 months. Lynch v. Harris County, 188 Ga. 651, 4 S.E.2d 573 (1939).

Nuisance. - When evidence shows that the extent of a nuisance has not increased, so as to amount to the additional taking of property or additional damages to the property owner inside the 12-month period, then any action is barred. However, if the nuisance occurs within or its extent is increased during the 12-month period so as to amount to an additional taking of property belonging to a party, then that portion of the property taken during the 12-month period would be actionable. Duffield v. DeKalb County, 242 Ga. 432, 249 S.E.2d 235 (1978).

Trial court did not err by failing to allow a property owner to assert the owner's nuisance claim against a county in relation to a second notice sent to the county because at best, the owner would only be allowed to assert a claim for a second time period if the owner could show that the extent of the nuisance had increased, so as to amount to the additional taking of property or additional damages to the property owner in the second 12-month period; the owner did not show that the county's taking increased after the original 12-month period. Bailey v. Annistown Rd. Baptist Church, Inc., 301 Ga. App. 677, 689 S.E.2d 62 (2009), cert. denied, No. S10C0669, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 468 (Ga. 2010).

Trial court did not err by denying a county's motion for directed verdict on the ground that a property owner's ante-litem notice expressly limited the owner's trespass and nuisance claims to personal property damages only because a directed verdict was not demanded when the owner's notice was ambiguous at worst, and a reasonable person could construe the notice to refer to all of the owner's property, personal and real. Bailey v. Annistown Rd. Baptist Church, Inc., 301 Ga. App. 677, 689 S.E.2d 62 (2009), cert. denied, No. S10C0669, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 468 (Ga. 2010).

Continuing nuisance. - Property owner is not barred from recovering for damages for a continuing nuisance, even when notice is not given within 12 months of completion of construction of the roadway. Reid v. Gwinnett County, 242 Ga. 88, 249 S.E.2d 559 (1978).

When appellee gave sufficient notice under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 that county had duty to abate nuisance, and when appellee was thereafter in compliance with § 36-11-1, appellee was entitled to appellee's remedy, regardless of whether or when subsequent injuries occurred on appellee's property as a result of the continuing nuisance. DeKalb County v. Bolick, 249 Ga. 843, 295 S.E.2d 92 (1982).

Bar provided by O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 is applicable in suits seeking to recover against a county for depreciation in market value of the property taken due to the alleged creation and maintenance of a continuing nuisance. Puckett v. Gwinnett County, 200 Ga. App. 53, 406 S.E.2d 561 (1991).

Taking private property. - All claims against a county for taking or damaging private property for public uses must be filed within 12 months, and suit thereon for the depreciation in the market value must be instituted within the period of limitations stipulated by the law. It is not the policy of the law to permit the bringing of suits against counties from time to time for damages which might result by reason of negligently constructed public improvements constituting a nuisance. Bibb County v. Green, 42 Ga. App. 552, 156 S.E. 745 (1931); Jones v. Fulton County, 207 Ga. App. 397, 427 S.E.2d 802 (1993).

Ratification of acts of agent. - Limitation of a claim against a county which is predicated on the ratification of acts of an alleged agent begins to run from the date of the ratification, and the claim is barred after the lapse of 12 months from the ratification. Standard Oil Co. v. Jasper County, 53 Ga. App. 804, 187 S.E. 307 (1936).

Materialman's liens. - Materialman may bring suit against the county prior to the completion of the work, if the contractor is then insolvent; in such case, the time when the contractor becomes insolvent is the time when the loss results and the county becomes subject to suit. Standard Oil Co. v. Jasper County, 53 Ga. App. 804, 187 S.E. 307 (1936).

Claim against a county, for a loss by a person who furnished material for the building of a road to a contractor who was not required by the county to give bond is barred after the lapse of one year from the date when the contractor became insolvent, and from the date when the materialman's lien against the contractor became due. Standard Oil Co. v. Jasper County, 53 Ga. App. 804, 187 S.E. 307 (1936).

Suits by imprisoned persons. - While there is no statutorily imposed disability which would prevent an imprisoned person from suing, O.C.G.A. § 9-3-90 provides an imprisoned person the benefit of a statutory provision tolling the statutes of limitation. The result is that a person imprisoned has an option of bringing an action while incarcerated or waiting until the period of incarceration ends. If the latter option is chosen, the period of limitation begins to run from the date of release, i.e., the time the "disability" is removed. Maddox v. Hall County, 162 Ga. App. 371, 291 S.E.2d 442 (1982).

Inmate's cause of action for negligence against county jail officials for giving the inmate another inmate's medication by mistake accrued on the date the inmate became aware of the mistake. Hayes v. Medical Dep't, 197 Ga. App. 563, 398 S.E.2d 837 (1990).

Claim for hospital care for prisoner. - Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia was required to comply with the ante litem notice requirement with regard to medical bills incurred by a prisoner resulting from a fight in jail since, although O.C.G.A. § 42-5-2(a) provided that a governmental unit having custody of a prisoner must furnish the prisoner with needed hospital attention, there was no law requiring payment by the governmental unit for such services. Board of Regents v. Putnam County, 234 Ga. App. 427, 506 S.E.2d 923 (1998).

Presentation of Claims

Sufficiency of presentation. - Writing should certainly show who makes the demand, for what reason the demand is made, and the amount thereof. Troup County v. Boddie, 14 Ga. App. 434, 81 S.E. 376 (1914).

Presentation of claim to outside counsel for county satisfies presentment requirement. - Trial court erred in awarding summary judgment to the county based on the fact that the letter from the plaintiff's attorney was not a proper presentment as the attorney for the county was not employed by the county in house because, to the extent that Coweta County v. Cooper, 318 Ga. App. 41 (2012), indicated that presentment could not properly be made to an outside county attorney, the supreme court disapproved of that decision; thus, notwithstanding that the county attorney was an outside attorney, the timely delivery of the plaintiff's otherwise adequate presentation of a claim against the county to the outside county attorney satisfied the statutory presentment requirement of O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Croy v. Whitfield County, 301 Ga. 380, 801 S.E.2d 892 (2017).

Claim barred for failure to serve ante-litem notice. - Trial court did not err in granting summary judgment to the deputy sheriff on the ground that any claim in the plaintiff's complaint that could be construed as a claim against the sheriff was barred because the plaintiff did not serve an ante-litem notice upon the sheriff; O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 applied to the counties and to the sheriffs, when sued in their official capacities; and claims against a sheriff were not sustainable without the ante-litem notice. Davis v. Morrison, 344 Ga. App. 527, 810 S.E.2d 649 (2018).

Claim in writing. - It is essential that the claim required to be filed with a county, as provided in this section, be in writing. Griffin Realty & Constr. Co. v. Chatham County, 47 Ga. App. 545, 171 S.E. 237 (1933).

All claims against counties must be presented in writing. A mere oral statement is insufficient. Williams v. Lowndes County, 120 Ga. App. 429, 170 S.E.2d 750 (1969); Doyal v. DOT, 142 Ga. App. 79, 234 S.E.2d 858 (1977).

Mere conversation not sufficient. - Conversations with members of board of commissioners looking to a compromise are not sufficient presentment. Powell v. County of Muscogee, 71 Ga. 587 (1883).

Conversations with individual commissioners or verbal proposals to compromise do not circumvent the limitation provided by O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Puckett v. Gwinnett County, 200 Ga. App. 53, 406 S.E.2d 561 (1991).

Presentation must be made within 12 months of accrual. - Claims against a county are required to be presented to the chair of the claims of commissioners within 12 months after the claims accrue. Ellenberg v. DeKalb County (In re Maytag Sales & Serv., Inc.), 23 Bankr. 384 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 1982).

Although an ante litem notice served by subdivision owners against a county arising out of a drainage system was insufficient under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1, the owners' complaint complied with § 36-11-1, but the owners' claims for negligence and permanent nuisance were barred by the one-year presentment requirement because the owners had seen standing water more than a year before serving the owners' complaint. Klingensmith v. Long County, 352 Ga. App. 21, 833 S.E.2d 608 (2019).

Bringing of suit within time limit is sufficient presentation of claim. Dement v. DeKalb County, 97 Ga. 733, 25 S.E. 382 (1896); Elbert County v. Brown, 16 Ga. App. 834, 86 S.E. 651 (1915); Mitchell County v. Dixon, 20 Ga. App. 21, 92 S.E. 405 (1917); Taylor v. Richmond County, 57 Ga. App. 586, 196 S.E. 303 (1938).

Service within 12 months. - Petition must not only be filed but served within 12 months after claim accrues. Pearson v. Newton County, 119 Ga. 863, 47 S.E. 180 (1904); Godfrey v. County of Jefferson, 21 Ga. App. 384, 94 S.E. 604 (1917).

Role of county attorney in presentment. - Presentment to the county attorney, inside or outside, is presentment for the purposes of O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Croy v. Whitfield County, 301 Ga. 380, 801 S.E.2d 892 (2017).

Presentment of a claim against a county under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 may be submitted to the governing authority by way of the county attorney as a matter of law. Croy v. Whitfield County, 301 Ga. 380, 801 S.E.2d 892 (2017).

Outside law firm not authorized to receive notice for county. - Trial court erred by ruling that there was substantial compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 by the plaintiffs sending notice of the plaintiff's suit against a county to a private law firm used by the county as outside legal counsel because the firm was not in-house or any department or official of a county and, thus, was not authorized to receive notice. Coweta County v. Cooper, 318 Ga. App. 41, 733 S.E.2d 348 (2012).

Presentment of claim to sheriff. - Trial court erred in denying the defendants' motion to dismiss on the ground that the plaintiff's claim against the sheriff was barred by the plaintiff's failure to provide the Sheriff's Office with notice of such claim under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 because the plaintiff was legally precluded from even naming the county as the proper defendant, and given that § 36-11-1 did not mandate otherwise, the presentment of a claim for which the sheriff can be held vicariously liable must be directed to the sheriff. Moats v. Mendez, 349 Ga. App. 811, 824 S.E.2d 808 (2019).

Twelve-month limit not applicable to claims against school district. - When the plaintiff failed to give the defendant school district written notice of plaintiff's claim within 12 months after the accrual of plaintiff's cause of action, the trial court properly determined that this failure did not constitute a bar to the action because the claim was against a county school district rather than a county because a claim against a county school district did not constitute a claim against the county within the contemplation of O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1. Payne v. Blackwell, 259 Ga. 483, 384 S.E.2d 393 (1989).
